New York, session 2025-2026, A2389.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 47 to read as follows: 3 (47)(A) Gift certificates, electronic gift cards and magnetic gift 4 cards. 5 (B) For the purpose of this paragraph: (i) the term "gift certificate" 6 means a writing identified as a gift certificate by an issuer for use by 7 a customer, whether or not redeemable for cash, and usable for its face 8 amount in lieu of cash for the exchange of goods or services supplied by 9 the seller. Gift certificates shall include electronic or magnetic cards 10 with a banked dollar value, a merchandise credit, a certificate where 11 the issuer has received payment for the full face value for the future 12 purchase or delivery of goods or services, and any other medium that 13 evidences the giving of consideration in exchange for the right to 14 redeem it for goods or services of at least an equal value. Pre-paid 15 calling arrangements, such as pre-paid phone cards, are not considered 16 gift certificates; (ii) the term "electronic gift card" or "magnetic 17 gift card" means a card with a banked dollar value that may be redeemed 18 for goods or services whereby the dollar amount of the card is reduced 19 accordingly. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first day of a quarterly sales 21 tax period, as set forth in subdivision (b) of section 1136 of the tax 22 law, next succeeding the thirtieth day after it shall have become a law. 23 Provided, however that the commissioner of taxation and finance shall 24 take any action necessary for the timely implementation of this act on 25 or before the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04534-01-5